de: Stil des Bauchpanels: Verstellbarer Bund; Umschlagbund; Kein Panel; Überbauch; Seitliche Stretcheinsätze; Unterbauch; Sonstige
pl: Styl panelu brzusznego: Regulowany pas; Wywijany pas; Bez paneli; Na brzuch; Elastyczne panele boczne; Pod brzuch; Inne
zh-TW: 腹部布料樣式: 可調式腰帶; 反折腰帶; 無托腹; 全托腹; 側邊彈性拼接; 下托腹; 其他
el: Τύπος προστατευτικού πάνελ κοιλιάς: Ρυθμιζόμενη ζώνη μέσης; Ζώνη μέσης που διπλώνει; Χωρίς φάσα; Πάνω από την κοιλιά; Πλαϊνές ελαστικές φάσες; Κάτω από την κοιλιά; Άλλο
hr-HR: Stil trbušnog panela: Prilagodljiva pasica; Preklopna pasica; Bez umetka; Iznad trbuha; Bočni rastezljivi umetci; Ispod trbuha; Ostalo
ru: Тип панели для живота: Регулируемый пояс; Пояс с отворотом; Без вставки; На живот; Боковые эластичные вставки; Под живот; Другое
fr: Style de panneau ventral: Taille réglable; Taille rabattable; Sans bandeau; Au-dessus du ventre; Bandeaux extensibles latéraux; Sous le ventre; Autre
pt-PT: Estilo de painel abdominal: Cós ajustável; Cós dobrável; Sem painel; Acima da barriga; Painéis elásticos laterais; Abaixo da barriga; Outro
nb: Magepanelstil: Justerbar linning; Nedbrettbar linning; Uten panel; Over magen; Stretchpaneler på sidene; Under magen; Annet
hu: Haspanelstílus: Állítható derékrész; Hajtókás derékrész; Panel nélküli; Pocakot takaró; Oldalsó sztreccs panelek; Pocak alatti; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu đai bụng: Đai lưng điều chỉnh được; Đai lưng gập; Không có dải thun bụng; Ôm trọn bụng; Dải co giãn hai bên; Nằm dưới bụng; Khác
zh-CN: 腹板样式: 可调节腰带; 折叠腰带; 无托腹; 覆盖孕肚; 侧边弹力拼接; 孕肚下方; 其他
lt-LT: Pilvo panelės tipas: Reguliuojamas juosmuo; Atlenkiamas juosmuo; Be įsiuvo; Virš pilvo; Tamprūs įsiuvai šonuose; Po pilvu; Kita
fi: Palkeen tyyppi: Säädettävä vyötärönauha; Käännettävä vyötärönauha; Ei paneelia; Vatsan yli menevä; Sivujoustot; Vatsan alle jäävä; Muu
sl-SI: Slog trebušnega dela: Nastavljiv pas; Pas z zavihkom; Brez podloge; Čez trebuh; Stranske raztegljive podloge; Pod trebuhom; Drugo
nl: Stijl van het buikpaneel: Verstelbare tailleband; Omvouwbare tailleband; Zonder buikband; Hoge buikband; Elastische inzetstukken zijkant; Lage buikband; Overige
sv: Magpanelstil: Justerbar midja; Nedvikbar midja; Utan panel; Över magen; Stretchpaneler i sidorna; Under magen; Övrigt
sk-SK: Štýl pracky: Nastaviteľný pás; Prehŕňací pás; Bez panela; Nad bruško; Bočné elastické panely; Pod bruško; Iné
ko: 복부 패널 유형: 조절식 허리 밴드; 접이식 허리 밴드; 패널 없음; 오버 더 범프; 측면 스트레치 패널; 언더 더 범프; 기타
it: Stile del pannello inferiore: Cintura regolabile; Cintura con risvolto; Senza fascia; Sopra il pancione; Pannelli laterali elasticizzati; Sotto il pancione; Altro
pt-BR: Estilo de painel abdominal: Cós ajustável; Cós dobrável; Sem painel; Acima da barriga; Painéis laterais elásticos; Abaixo da barriga; Outros
ja: 腹部パネルスタイル: 調節可能なウエストバンド; 折り返しウエストバンド; パネルなし; オーバーザバンプ; サイドストレッチパネル; アンダーザバンプ; その他
bg-BG: Стил на коремния панел: Регулируем колан; Колан с прегъване; Без панел; Над корема; Странични еластични панели; Под корема; Друго
es: Estilo de panel abdominal: Pretina ajustable; Pretina plegable; Sin panel; Sobre el vientre; Paneles elásticos laterales; Bajo el vientre; Otro
en: Belly panel style: Adjustable waistband; Fold-over waistband; No panel; Over-the-bump; Side-stretch panels; Under-the-bump; Other
th: สไตล์แผงหน้าท้อง: ขอบเอวปรับได้; ขอบเอวพับทบ; ไม่มีแถบพยุงครรภ์; คลุมหน้าท้อง; แถบยืดด้านข้าง; ใต้หน้าท้อง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Stilul panoului de burtă: Bandă în talie reglabilă; Bandă în talie pliabilă; Fără panou; Peste burtă; Panouri laterale elastice; Sub burtă; Altele
da: Type af mavepanel: Justerbar linning; Ombukket linning; Uden panel; Over maven; Strækpaneler i siden; Under maven; Anden
tr: Karın paneli stili: Ayarlanabilir bel bandı; Kıvrılabilir bel bandı; Panelsiz; Göbek üstü; Yanları esnek panel; Göbek altı; Diğer
cs: Styl břišního panelu: Nastavitelný pas; Ohrnovací pas; Bez panelu; Přes bříško; Boční strečové panely; Pod bříškem; Jiné